Idaho, session 2026, S1417.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Parks and Recreation the
following amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and
expense classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2026, through
June 30, 2027:
FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. PARK OPERATIONS:
FROM:
Parks and Recreation
Fund $287,900 $120,000 $1,100,000 $1,507,900
Recreational Fuels
Fund 25,000 15,000 1,326,000 1,366,000
Parks and Recreation Registration
Fund 25,000 15,000 40,000
Federal Grant
Fund 0 0 475,000 $1,877,500 2,352,500
TOTAL $337,900 $150,000 $2,901,000 $1,877,500 $5,266,400
II. CAPITAL DEVELOPMENT:
FROM:
Parks and Recreation Registration
Fund $9,500,000 $9,500,000
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 1,500,000 1,500,000


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Federal Grant
Fund 1,863,500 1,863,500
TOTAL $12,863,500 $12,863,500
GRANDTOTAL $337,900 $150,000 $15,764,500 $1,877,500 $18,129,900
SECTION 2. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In addition to any other authorization
provided by law, the full-time equivalent position authorization provided
to the Department of Parks and Recreation is hereby increased by two and
ninety-five hundredths (2.95) for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30,
2027.
SECTION 3. EXEMPTIONS FROM PROGRAM TRANSFER LIMITATIONS. The Depart-
ment of Parks and Recreation is hereby exempted from the provisions of
Section 67-3511(2), Idaho Code, allowing unlimited transfers between pro-
grams for all moneys appropriated to it for trustee and benefit payments for
the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026. Legislative appropriations
shall not be transferred from one fund to another fund unless expressly ap-
proved by the Legislature.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Section 3 of this act shall be in full force and effect on
and after passage and approval, and Sections 1 and 2 of this act shall be in
full force and effect on and after July 1, 2026.